Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.904

Effective date—1989 c 347.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 1, 1989.

[ 1989 c 347 s 11.]